src/morphology/stems/new_words_from_stories.lexc
LEXICON NU_VAIO
naanzon:inaanzon    # "dye" ;
taason:ataason    # "store sth." ; !missing derivation, taaso is also possible

LEXICON NU_VII
mnidoonaagod:manidoonaagod2   # ; !maybe related to mji-mnidoo, mnidoo- has something to do with magic/ritual it seems !should be vii mnidoonaagod
aagwaate:aagawaate'o # "shade someone" ;
bkise:bakise # "break apart" ; !in West
bekaadendaagod:bekaadendaagod # "be at peace, be content" ; !see bekaadendam, is -aagod "seem" or something like that?
bgamshkaa:bagamashkaa    # ; !something to do with adoption?
bgojgin:bagojigin    # "grow" ;
biisniiskaa:biisiniiskaa    # "be in little stone pieces" ; !not clear where -iiskaa comes from
bmaabkaa:bimaabikaa    # "cliff" ; !first vowel is either a or i, based on CCNJ 
bmaabkisin:bimaabikisin    # "cliff" ; !apparently an error for bmabkaa
booniise:booniise    # "land" ;
giitaawaaksin:giitaawaakosin # "lie in a wheel shape" ; !related to -aako, sticklike object
giizhgad:giizhigad    # "be day" ; !missing derivation. maybe already in tmp.lexc?
gidaakiiwan:agidaakiiwan    # "be a hill" ;
kwaakoon'gat:akwaankoonagad    # ; !irrational compounding
ndaa'aagmishkaa:nandaa'aagamishkaa    # "stir" ; !final is weird, should this actually be ndaa'aagmishkaa? something to do with stirring and something to do with something coming off
naab-igaade # ; !something to do with tying
naabkaa:inaabikaa    # "be a rock shaped in such a way" ;
naagmat    # "follow" ;
naagmishkaa # "swirl" ;
naagse # "flip" ;
niibde'aabiigmod # "be in a line (of strings)" ;
niizhgon    # "two days" ; !might actually just be be niizhik+VII
niizhin # "be two in number" ;
piitaande    # ; !lots of piit but none with aande
shpimin # ; !from adv shpiming "high"
waannamo # "the road is torturous" ; !related to waagnaagzi and -omo and waan-
wewebjiwan # "when the current roils" ; !place name wewe-bjiwan-g
zaagbii    # ; !maybe related to zaaggwiinde "stick out of the water"
zegwiindmaa    # ; !zeg- is about fear, wiindam is "great depths of water," maybe about fear of water?
zhi-yaa:izhi-ayaa    # "be in a certain way" ; !listed as both a VAI and VII
kwegat:akwegat    # "be of such a length" ; !<d> or <t> for UR?
wiigwaas:wiigwaas    # ; !missing derivation, weirdness with attaching -kaa to this, it seems
namo:inamo    # "way the road goes" ;
waangaade:waangaade    # "be dug" ; 
zhiwebad:izhiwebad2 # "1 happen, be a certain way, 2 be a certain kind of weather" ; !missing inflection of zhiwebat

LEXICON NU_VTI
baashdakaadaan    # ; !baashk- related to passing or bursting
gboobdoon    # ; !formed from gibo "block/cinch" and -bidoo "tie"
gdaa'aanaa    # "have" ; !this is maybe another weird form of yaan? maybe just straight up correctly analyzed when spelling is corrected though?
giishkjaanegdaan    # ; !formed from giishk (cut) jaane (nose) and dam (VTI), missing derivation
giishkkwegdaan    # ; !formed from giishk (cut) kweg (neck) and dam (VTI), missing derivation
giiwebtwaadaan    # ; !morphological problem, waad could actually be waaN
maajiibtwaadaan    # ; !morphological problem, waad could actually be waaN
maamnwendaan:maaminwendaan    # "like, remember" ; !should the def. be something like "like to remember"
mnjimendaan:minjimend    # "remember" ;
onjinaazhkaw # "using the body (as you might while chasing)" ; !need lex passive
pagdood    # ; !morphological problem
yaan    # "have" ; !weird form of this wdaahaan?
zhiwebnaan    # "whirl" ; !related to od-izhiwebin?
daakwaan    # "pry it up" ;
gidaakiiwedaabaadaan:agidaakiiwebaad    # "walk up the hill" ;
daakhaan    # "pry it up" ;
jiibshkaan:jiibVv1shk    # "jostle" ;
gwiidaakwaan    # "pry sth. up" ;
dbaaknaan:dibaakon1    # "judge smb." ; !missing derivation, semantic problems, phonological problems

LEXICON NU_VTA
baapchi'aa # "play tricks, make fun" ; !related to baapichigaade
ggwejmaamaa    # ; !derived from ggweji "test" and maam "smell"
giishkjaanegnaamaa # "split nose by hitting" ; !syncope
gobnaa:agobin    # "tie on" ; !phonological problem with missing initial <d>
kwaawaa    # "attack" ; 
mnjignikenaa:minjigonikenaa # "hold by the arms" ; !from minjigon
naagdawenmaa    # ; "look after sth. for smb." ; !related to naagdawendmawaa, morphological problem
n'gwaanaa # "trap, snare" ;
njignaamaa # "smack with force" ; !nji- might be pv?
noozwinkaanaa:anoozowinikaan    # "sign sth." ; !missing derivation, related to noozwin'kaadaan?
nzwaa:onzw    # "boil" ; !phonological problem
poogji'aa # ; !some relation to boog-
nndonewaa:nandonehw    # "look for s.o." ; !phonological problems
bmibtwaanaa:bimibatwaan1    # "run along with" ;
pogjiikwaa:apogojiikaw    # "pester" ; !really unsure about UR
gzhiibndibebnaa:gizhiibndibebin1    # "scratch one's head" ; !undersyncope
shigjiishknaa:zhashigojiishkVv1n    # ; !undersyncope, unsure about UR, Rand thinks it's a VTI -> VTA
doodemmaa    # "have smb. as a totem" ;
giiddaaknaa    # "set smb. free" ; !or maybe jail smb.?
wiijiiwaa:wiijiiw    # "accompany smb." ; !already in tmp.lexc

LEXICON NU_NAD
ngo-doodem    # "family, clan" ; !ngo- is paired with da- in the actual example, spelled dango-, doodem is a listed word for family
n-wiikane    # "brother" ; !phonological problem w/ syncope, related to niikaan "my brother," -e from the contemptive

LEXICON NU_NID
ndoondan:doondana    # "my heel" ; !looks like this might already be in the dictionary, can the spelling correcter handle doondnang?

LEXICON NU_NI
aankwaan    # "fort" ; !or maybe the northern word for hat?
Baawting    # ; !place name (Sault Sainte Marie)
Baawtigoong # "Sault Sainte Marie" ; !place name
Gchi-gwednong # ; !place name w initial change
kodaandwaagan:kodaandawaagan    # "stairway" ; !not sure about the UR
M'chigeeng # "M'chigiing" ; !place name on Manitoulin
Maanii-giizhgat    # ; !obviously some kinda day, comments speculate Saturday, America seems to be mookmaani
Manitoulin    # ; !place name
Mchigodnong # ; !place name
min'gan    # "salve" ; !maybe needs an initial <b>
Mindemoya # "Mindemoya" ; !place name on Manitoulin
mindimooyenh # "Mindemoya" ; !place name on Manitoulin syncope
moodyaabik:modayaabik    # "little bottle" ; 
mtiggamik:mitigogamik    # ; !morphological and phonological problems; !also UR is maybe wrong since Rand says that mtigo- is the wrong analysis here?
nag'ay    # "skin, rind" ; !related to the NID nnag'ay
skoon'gamik:iskoonigamiko    # "school" ; !maybe already in the dictionary but I couldn't get an analysis
zaaghigan # ; !need compounding
datgaagmingaawanzh:odatagaagominagaawanzh    # "blackberry bush" ; !missing derivation
Zaagiinaa:zaagiinaa    # "Saginaw, Mich." ; !phonological problems
daawaanaang:odaawaanaang    # "Odawa land" ;
Waagnaakzing:waaginaakizing    # ; !name place of the crooked tree, undersyncope
mmagzi:mamagizi    # "smallpox" ; !is this a NI or VAI? NI derived from VAI?

LEXICON NU_NA
baanaabekwe # "mermaid" ; !related to baanaabe
Biimtaygan    # ; !name
Debaasge    # ; !name
Ebiins:Abence # ; !name
Niibaakhom # "night thunderer" ; !name
piinish # "animal" ; !unclear without context
gchi-haa:gchi-ahaa    # "big children" ;
gchi-haans:gchi-ahaans    # "big chilren (DIM)" ; !note to list this with the form above, so I have
wiintam    # "him next" ; 
biipiigwenh:biipiigweny    # "bird" ;
Ettawagiizhik:edawegiizhig     # ; !name, phonological and orthographical problems
Mkade-bnesi:makade-binesi    # "blackbird" ; !name
Waakezoo    # ; !name
biipiigenh:biipiigeny    # "bird" ; !obviously essentially same as biipiigwenh, but thought I should add it anyway cuz the <w> is missing here
giiwsewnini:giiwoseaniniw2    # hunter ; !missing derivation, phonological problem
Mkadebnesi:makadebinesi    # ; !name, same as Mkade-bnesi, but without the hyphen
